District of Columbia statutes.
31-4707

Ascertainment of loan indebtedness.

In ascertaining the indebtedness due upon policy or premium loans the interest, if not paid when due, shall be added to the principal of such loans and shall bear interest at the rate specified in the note or loan agreement.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1164, ch. 672, ch. V, § 7
1981 Ed., § 35-511.
1973 Ed., § 35-707.